Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-721
Secretary of State; Auditor of Public Accounts; State Treasurer; Lieutenant Governor; salaries.

Until January 4, 2007, there shall be paid as salaries to certain constitutional officers as follows: Secretary of State, the sum of sixty-five thousand dollars per year; Auditor of Public Accounts, the sum of sixty thousand dollars per year; State Treasurer, the sum of sixty thousand dollars per year; and Lieutenant Governor, the sum of sixty thousand dollars per year. Commencing January 4, 2007, there shall be paid as salaries to certain constitutional officers as follows: Secretary of State, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year; Auditor of Public Accounts, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year; State Treasurer, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year; and Lieutenant Governor, the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars per year. Such salaries shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

Laws 1951, c. 333, § 1, p. 1108;

Laws 1957, c. 397, § 2, p. 1363;

Laws 1959, c. 454, § 1, p. 1508;

Laws 1961, c. 456, § 1, p. 1394;

Laws 1963, c. 538, § 2, p. 1684;

Laws 1963, c. 537, § 1, p. 1683;

Laws 1965, c. 567, § 2, p. 1853;

Laws 1969, c. 834, § 1, p. 3157;

Laws 1969, c. 835, § 1, p. 3158;

Laws 1969, c. 836, § 1, p. 3159;

Laws 1973, LB 246, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 541, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 43, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 503, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 956, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 817, § 4.

For salaries of other constitutional officers:

Attorney General, see section 84-201.01.

Governor, see section 84-101.01.